apertium-bel.bel.dix
    <pardef n="/ты__prn">
      <e><p><l>ты</l><r>ты<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>цябе</l><r>ты<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>табе</l><r>ты<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>цябе</l><r>ты<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>табой</l><r>ты<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>табою</l><r>ты<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>табе</l><r>ты<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ён__prn">
      <e><p><l>ён</l><r>ён<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яго</l><r>ён<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яму</l><r>ён<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яго</l><r>ён<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ім</l><r>ён<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ім</l><r>ён<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/яна__prn"> <!-- TODO: add pprep -->
      <e><p><l>яна</l><r>яна<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яе</l><r>яна<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ёй</l><r>яна<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pprep"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ёй</l><r>яна<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яе</l><r>яна<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ёй</l><r>яна<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ёй</l><r>яна<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/яно__prn">
      <e><p><l>яно</l><r>яно<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яго</l><r>яно<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яму</l><r>яно<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>яго</l><r>яно<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ім</l><r>яно<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ім</l><r>яно<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/мы__prn">
      <e><p><l>мы</l><r>мы<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нас</l><r>мы<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нам</l><r>мы<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нас</l><r>мы<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>намі</l><r>мы<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нас</l><r>мы<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/вы__prn">
      <e><p><l>вы</l><r>вы<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>вы</l><r>вы<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вас</l><r>вы<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вам</l><r>вы<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вас</l><r>вы<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вамі</l><r>вы<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вас</l><r>вы<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/яны__prn">
      <e><p><l>яны</l><r>яны<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>іх</l><r>яны<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ім</l><r>яны<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>іх</l><r>яны<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>імі</l><r>яны<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>іх</l><r>яны<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="с/ябе__prn">
      <e><p><l>ябе</l><r>ябе<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>абе</l><r>ябе<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ябе</l><r>ябе<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>абой</l><r>ябе<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>абою</l><r>ябе<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>абе</l><r>ябе<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="сам__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="BASE__сам"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/што__prn">
      <e><p><l>што</l><r>што<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>чаго</l><r>што<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>чаму</l><r>што<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>што</l><r>што<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>чым</l><r>што<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>чым</l><r>што<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/нішто__prn">
      <e><p><l>нішто</l><r>нішто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нічога</l><r>нішто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нічому</l><r>нішто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нішто</l><r>нішто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нічым</l><r>нішто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ні<b/>аб<b/>чым</l><r>нішто<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ты"><i></i><par n="/ты__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ён"><i></i><par n="/ён__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="яна"><i></i><par n="/яна__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="яно"><i></i><par n="/яно__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="мы"><i></i><par n="/мы__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="вы"><i></i><par n="/вы__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="яны"><i></i><par n="/яны__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="сябе"><i>с</i><par n="с/ябе__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="сам"><i>сам</i><par n="сам__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="што"><i></i><par n="/што__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="нішто"><i></i><par n="/нішто__prn"/></e>
